Maryland, session 2026, SB0464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Commission to Examine the Expungement Laws of Maryland.
(b) The Commission consists of:
(1) two members of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) two members of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) the President of the Maryland State’s Attorneys’ Association, or the
President’s designee;
(4) the Public Defender, or the Public Defender’s designee;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0464*

SENATE BILL 464
(5) the State Court Administrator, or the Administrator’s designee;
(6) the Secretary of Public Safety and Correctional Services, or the
Secretary’s designee; and
(7) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of a research organization studying the
impact criminal records have on individuals in Maryland;
(ii) two individuals who are members of the Maryland bar with
experience providing expungement representation on behalf of Maryland residents;
(iii) one representative of a workforce organization in Maryland with
experience securing employment for individuals with criminal records;
(iv) one representative of an organization that assists individuals
with criminal records to reacclimate to society;
(v) two representatives of two different crime victims’ advocacy
groups, including one with expertise serving criminalized survivors of violence; and
(vi) two individuals who have a criminal record that is currently
ineligible for expungement;
(vii) one representative of the Maryland Chiefs of Police Association;
(viii) one representative of the Maryland Sheriffs’ Association;
(ix) one representative of the Maryland Crime Victims’ Resource
Center; and
(x) one representative of the Maryland Network Against Domestic
Violence.
(c) The members of the Commission shall elect a chair from among the members
of the Commission.
(d) The Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention and Policy shall provide staff for
the Commission.
(e) A member of the Commission:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but

SENATE BILL 464 3
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Commission shall:
(1) examine the expungement laws of Maryland and the current
expungement process under Title 10, Subtitle 1 of the Criminal Procedure Article for issues
of efficiency and equity;
(2) review comparable states’ expungement laws and their processes; and
(3) develop an alternate statutory scheme that provides a streamlined
process and broader eligibility.
(g) On or before December 31, 2027 2028, the Commission shall, in accordance
with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, submit a report to the General Assembly of
its findings and recommendations.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026 2027. It shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end
of June 30, 2028 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.